Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-737
School books; ownership; care; liability of pupils for damage.

All books purchased by a school board or board of education shall be the property of the district and loaned free of charge to pupils of the school while they are pursuing a course of study in the school, but the board shall hold such pupils responsible for any damage to, loss of, or failure to return such books at the time and to the person that may be designated by the board.

Laws 1891, c. 46, § 9, p. 336;

R.S.1913, § 6922;

C.S.1922, § 6506;

C.S.1929, § 79-1809;

R.S.1943, § 79-1809;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 159, p. 745;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,121;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 411.